Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Voluntary Farm Debt Mediation Program

§§ 69-2-43 through 69-2-49.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1990, ch. 496, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§69-2-43 through §69-2-49. [Laws, 1987, ch. 482, §§ 22-25; reenacted, Laws, 1988, ch. 425, §§ 1-4; reenacted, Laws, 1990, ch. 496, §§ 1-4, eff from and after July 1, 1990]

§ 69-2-51.
Prospective repeal of voluntary mediation provisions.

Sections 69-2-43 through 69-2-49 of this chapter, which create a Farm Mediation Office in the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and which provide for the mediation of certain agricultural debts, shall stand repealed from and after July 1, 1992.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 26; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1988, ch. 425, § 5; amended, Laws, 1990, ch. 496, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1990.